West Virginia, session 2026, HB5591.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. PHARMACISTS, PHARMACY TECHNICIANS, PHARMACY INTERNS AND PHARMACIES. §30-5-37. Sale of Ivermectin without a prescription; establishing protections. (a) A pharmacist may dispense ivermectin to a person, without requiring a prescription from a licensed healthcare practitioner, in accordance with written standardized procedures or protocols issued by the board, including, if required, providing the person with instructions on the proper use of ivermectin.(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a pharmacist acting in a reasonably prudent manner is not criminally or civilly liable or subject to professional disciplinary action for dispensing ivermectin in accordance with this section. (c) The board may propose rules for legislative approval, in accordance with the provisions of §29A-3-1, et seq. of this code, to implement the provisions of this section.